Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6.4 Incentive for Training and Employment

40-6.4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Incentive for Training and Employment Act” (RIITE).

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1.

40-6.4-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“AFDC” means aid to families with dependent children.

“Department” means the state department of human services.

“Director” means the director of the department of human services.

“Person with disabilities” means an individual who is under a physical or mental impairment that constitutes a substantial barrier to employment and who either is: (i) Receiving any form of state or federal aid, or (ii) Has a household income below the federal poverty level.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 96; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 96.

40-6.4-3.
Program established.

The director, in consultation with the director of the division of vocational rehabilitation, shall establish a three-year (3) demonstration work-preparation and supportive work-employment program to place AFDC recipients and people with disabilities in private-sector employment. At least one-third (1/3) of the supportive work-employment program costs shall be covered by payment for services by the participating private employers. The program shall include the use of grant diversion to enable the director to provide all or part of the AFDC or other federal grant to an employer to cover part of the cost of wages paid to the recipient. The program shall also seek all available federal and private funds. The director shall seek federal approval, including waivers of applicable federal regulations as are necessary, to conduct the demonstration program for AFDC recipients and people with disabilities, using grant diversion. The demonstration program shall test the effectiveness of a supported work grant-diversion program in placing AFDC recipients and handicapped persons in long-term employment at wage levels and with advancement potential sufficient to permit economic self-sufficiency and permanent removal from AFDC or other government aid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 96; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 96.

40-6.4-4.
Program voluntary — Elements of program.

The program shall serve both those AFDC recipients and people with disabilities who are ready to work and those who are potentially able to work given adequate support and job-readiness training. Participation in the program shall be strictly voluntary in all respects. The demonstration program shall include the following elements:

Provisions for referral and outreach, that will ensure the participation of those who are ready to work and those who require job-readiness training;

Utilization of the current system of supportive services, such as job-readiness training, child care, transportation, and transitional medical benefits, provided through the department of human services or other applicable provider agencies; and

An evaluation component to provide accountability and replicability, to demonstrate the cost-effectiveness of the supported work grant-diversion model, and to enable comparison with other work models.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 96; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 96.

40-6.4-5.
Recruitment, assessment, training, and referral of program candidates.

The director shall contract with one or more government agencies or nonprofit community-based organizations for the purpose of recruitment, screening, assessment, job-readiness preparation, and referral to supportive work. The government agencies or private organizations shall have a demonstrated record of service to AFDC recipients and/or people with disabilities, and shall have experience in conducting outreach and recruitment, intake and assessment of clients, and providing job-readiness training. The organizations shall:

Recruit, screen and assess the job-readiness skills of AFDC recipients and persons with disabilities for the supported work program;

Where appropriate, provide job-readiness skills training for program participants, including, but not limited to, remedial reading, writing, and mathematics skills training; and

Refer appropriate candidates for work in the supported work program.

At least one-third (1/3) of the participants referred to and placed in the supported work program shall currently be enrolled in employment readiness training and referred from a nonprofit, community-based organization or from other organizations certified by the director as conducting appropriate job-readiness training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 96; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 96.

40-6.4-6.
Program operator.

The director shall contract with a program operator to place participants in private-sector employment. The program operator shall have demonstrated experience in administering a large-scale supported work program that utilizes grant diversion, including:

Experience in developing comprehensive and diverse cooperative agreements with the private sector;

Providing on-the-job supervision of program participants and graduated stress and peer support;

Performing task analysis of entry-level jobs; and

Restructuring work to meet the needs of the participant population.

The program operator shall place participants under contract with private-sector companies in supported work environments and, at the end of supported work training, shall place the participants in permanent unsubsidized jobs in private-sector companies. The supported work training shall not exceed nine (9) months in duration for each participant; provided, however, that the director, in his or her discretion, may extend the period of supportive work training for a person with a disability for not more than nine (9) additional months if the director determines that an extension is necessary to enable the person with a disability to obtain the full benefit of the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 96; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 96.

40-6.4-7.
Rules and regulations.

The director is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1.

40-6.4-8.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 280, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 18, effective July 3, 2006.